Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1738
Multilevel parking facility; not subject to eminent domain; when.

Multilevel parking structures now used or hereafter acquired for offstreet motor vehicle parking by a private operator shall not be subject to eminent domain for the purpose of creating a parking facility pursuant to sections 14-1733, 14-1735, 14-1737, and 14-1738 when such multilevel structure has a capacity of more than two hundred automobiles.

Laws 1971, LB 238, § 8;

Laws 1977, LB 238, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 181, § 4.